District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.17

Continuation of privileges to practice.

(a)

A health-care professional who has the privilege of practicing at the United Medical Center as of September 14, 2011, shall retain practice privileges with the Corporation until the:

(1)

Privilege expires;

(2)

Board alters or amends the privilege; or

(3)

Board revokes the privilege.

(b)

The Board shall retain the policies regarding determining the qualifications for health-care professionals to receive the privilege of practicing that existed at United Medical Center on the day prior to September 14, 2011, until the Corporation replaces the policies pursuant to § 44-951.05(i).

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5128, 58 DCR 6226